Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-3] Licensing requirements. (a)
No person, wherever located, shall act as a provider or broker with an owner
who is a resident of this State, without first having obtained a license from
the commissioner.

(b) Application for a provider or broker
license shall be made to the commissioner by the applicant on a form prescribed
by the commissioner, and the application shall be accompanied by a fee in the
amount provided by section 431:7-101.

(c) A person, wherever located, may act as a
broker with an owner who is a resident of this State, if the person is a life
insurance producer who has been duly licensed as a resident insurance producer
with a life line of authority in this State or the producer's home state for at
least one year and is issued a broker license in this State.

(d) Not later than thirty days from the first
day of operating as a broker, the life insurance producer shall notify the
commissioner that the life insurance producer is acting as a broker on a form
prescribed by the commissioner, and shall pay a fee in the amount provided by
section 431:7-101. Notification shall include an acknowledgment by the life
insurance producer that the life insurance producer will operate as a broker in
accordance with this chapter.

(e) The insurer that issued the policy that is
the subject of a life settlement contract shall not be responsible for any act
or omission of a broker, provider, or purchaser, arising out of or in
connection with the life settlement transaction, unless the insurer receives
compensation for the placement of a life settlement contract from the provider,
purchaser, or broker in connection with the life settlement contract.

(f) A person licensed as an attorney,
certified public accountant, or financial planner accredited by a nationally
recognized accreditation agency, who is retained to represent the owner in the
type of practice customarily performed in the person's professional capacity,
and whose compensation is not paid directly or indirectly by the provider or
purchaser, may negotiate life settlement contracts on behalf of the owner
without obtaining a license as a broker.

(g) Licenses are issued and renewed in
accordance with article 9A of chapter 431 upon payment of fees in the amounts
required under section 431:7-101. Failure to pay the fees within the terms
prescribed shall result in the automatic inactivation of the license.

(h) The applicant shall provide such
information as the commissioner may require on forms prepared by the
commissioner. The commissioner shall have authority, at any time, to require
such applicant to fully disclose the identity of its stockholders, other than
stockholders owning fewer than ten per cent of the shares of an applicant whose
shares are publicly traded, and the identity of its partners, officers, and
employees. The commissioner may, in the exercise of the commissioner's sole
discretion, refuse to issue such a license in the name of any person if not
satisfied that any officer, employee, identified stockholder, or partner thereof
who may materially influence the applicant's conduct meets the standards under
subsection (j).

(i) A provider license issued to a
partnership, corporation, or other entity authorizes all members, officers, and
designated employees to act as a licensee under the license, if those persons
are named in the application and any supplements to the application. A
business entity licensed pursuant to this subsection shall designate an
individual who is responsible for the actions of the entity and its agents.
The designated individual shall be licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(j) Upon the filing of an application and the
payment of the license fee, the commissioner shall make an investigation of
each applicant and may issue a provider or a broker license if the commissioner
finds that the applicant:

(1) If a provider, has provided a detailed plan of
operation;

(2) Is competent and trustworthy and intends to
transact its business in good faith;

(3) Has a good business reputation and has had
experience, training, or education so as to be qualified in the business for
which the license is applied;

(4) If a legal entity, is formed or organized
pursuant to the laws of this State or is a foreign legal entity authorized to
transact business in this State, or provides a certificate of good standing
from the state of its domicile; and

(5) Has provided to the commissioner an anti-fraud
plan that meets the requirements of section 431C-48.

(k) Each licensed nonresident broker or
provider shall appoint the commissioner as its agent to receive service of
legal process issued against the broker or provider in this State upon causes
of action arising within this State. Service upon the commissioner as agent
shall constitute effective legal service upon the broker or provider. The
appointment shall be irrevocable for as long as there could be any cause of
action against the broker or provider arising out of the broker's or provider's
insurance transactions in this State. Service of process on the commissioner
shall be made in accordance with section 431:2-206.

(l) Each licensee shall file with the
commissioner on or before the first day of March of each year an annual
statement containing the information as the commissioner by rule may prescribe.

(m) A provider may not use any person to
perform the functions of a broker unless the person holds a current, valid
license as a broker.

(n) A broker may not use any person to perform
the functions of a provider as defined in this chapter unless such person holds
a current, valid license as a provider, and as provided in this section.

(o) A provider or broker shall provide to the
commissioner new or revised information about officers, ten per cent or more
stockholders, partners, directors, members, or designated employees within
thirty days of the change. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next